Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
EXAMINATIONS

[§431C-11] Examination. (a) The
commissioner may, when the commissioner deems it reasonably necessary to
protect the interests of the public, examine the business and affairs of any
licensee or applicant for a license. The commissioner may order any licensee
or applicant to produce any records, books, files or other information
reasonably necessary to ascertain whether such licensee or applicant is acting
or has acted in violation of the law or otherwise contrary to the interests of
the public. The expenses incurred in conducting any examination shall be paid
by the licensee or applicant.

(b) In lieu of an examination under this
chapter of any foreign or alien licensee licensed in this State, the
commissioner may, at the commissioner's discretion, accept an examination
report on the licensee as prepared by the commissioner or the chief insurance
regulatory official for the licensee's state of domicile or port-of-entry
state.

(c) Records of all consummated transactions
and life settlement contracts shall be maintained by the provider for three
years after the death of the insured and shall be available to the commissioner
for inspection during reasonable business hours. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next